Rhode Island statutes. Title 11 Criminal Offenses
Chapter 47.1
Large Capacity Feeding Device Ban of 2022

11-47.1-1.
Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Rhode Island Large Capacity Feeding Device Ban Act of 2022.”

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 99, § 1, effective June 20, 2022.

11-47.1-2.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Federally licensed firearm dealer” means a person who holds a valid federal firearm dealers license issued pursuant to 18 U.S.C. § 923(a).

“Large capacity feeding device” means a magazine, box, drum, tube, belt, feed strip, or other ammunition feeding device which is capable of holding, or can readily be extended to hold, more than ten (10) rounds of ammunition to be fed continuously and directly therefrom into a semi-automatic firearm. The term shall not include an attached tubular device which is capable of holding only .22 caliber rimfire ammunition.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 99, § 1, effective June 20, 2022.

11-47.1-3.
Large capacity feeding devices prohibited.

No person, except for a federally licensed firearm dealer, shall manufacture, sell, offer to sell, transfer, purchase, possess, or have under his or her control a large capacity feeding device, except as otherwise authorized under this chapter. Any person convicted of violating the provisions of this section shall be punished by imprisonment of not more than five (5) years, or by a fine of up to five thousand dollars ($5,000), and the large capacity feeding device shall be subject to forfeiture.

The provisions of subsection (a) of this section shall not apply to:

Any person who, on June 20, 2022, lawfully possesses a large capacity feeding device; provided that, within one hundred eighty (180) days of June 20, 2022, the person:

Permanently modifies the large capacity feeding device such that it cannot hold more than ten (10) rounds of ammunition;

Surrenders the large capacity feeding device to the police department in the city or town where the person resides in accordance with the procedures for surrender of weapons set forth by the police department or the Rhode Island state police, or, if there is no such police department or the person resides out of state, to the Rhode Island state police; or

Transfers or sells the large capacity feeding device to a federally licensed firearm dealer or person or firm outside the State of Rhode Island that is lawfully entitled to own or possess such a feeding device.

Any law enforcement officer exempt under §§

11-47-9

and

11-47-9.1

; or

A retired law enforcement officer exempt under §§

11-47-9

and

11-47-9.1

who is not otherwise prohibited from receiving such a feeding device from such agency upon retirement, and who has a permit to carry pursuant to §

11-47-18(b)

.

An active duty member of the Armed Forces of the United States or the National Guard who is authorized to possess and carry such a feeding device.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 99, § 1, effective June 20, 2022.